src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON LUONDU !!= * __@CODE@__ this word (+vuohta) because of behavior in compounds, where it is normally in SgGen: luonddubiebmu
              +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>                                     RHyph               ;
              +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4                                   R                   ; !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
     +N+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:%>X5jd                                 R                   ;
              +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd                           R                   ;

                 +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K                   ;
                    < "+N":0 "+Sg":0 "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3V               ;
                    +N+Ess:%>n                                    K                   ;
                    +N+Ess:%>n%>                                  NPxC                ;
                        +N:%>X2                                   GOAHTA-             ; ! Px sublexicon
                        +N:%>X3                                   GOAHTAI             ; ! Ill sublexicon
               +N+Err/Orth:%>                                     GOAHTAI             ; ! Ill sublexicon
                 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   K                   ;
                 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   K                   ;
                 +N+Sg+Gen:%>X4                                   NPx3V               ;
                 +N+Sg+Acc:%>X4                                   NPx3V               ;
                 +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4s                                  K                   ;
  +N+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n                                  K                   ; ! !SOUTH
                 +N+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%>                               NPxC                ;
                 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X4t                                  K                   ;
        +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4k                                  K                   ; ! !Skániid dialect
        +N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>X5jn                                 K                   ;
                 +N+Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn                           K                   ;
        +N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>X5jn%>                               NPxC                ;
                 +N+Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn%>                         NPxC                ;
!       +N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X5jd%>                               NPx1C               ;
!                +N+Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%>                         NPx1C               ;
        +N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X5jd                                 K                   ;
                 +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd                           K                   ;
        +N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X5jd%>                               NPxC                ;
                 +N+Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%>                         NPxC                ;
        +N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X5jd                                 K                   ;
                 +N+Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd                           K                   ;
        +N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X5jd%>                               NPxC                ;
                 +N+Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%>                         NPxC                ;
        +N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%>X5jde                                K                   ;
                 +N+Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde                          K                   ;
        +N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%>X5jdasa%>                            NPxVvowch           ;
                 +N+Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%>                      NPxVvowch           ;
        +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X5jn                                 K                   ;
                 +N+Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn                           K                   ;
  +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X5js                                 K                   ; ! !SOUTH
  +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs                           K                   ; ! !SOUTH
        +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X5jn%>                               NPxC                ;
                 +N+Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%>                         NPxC                ;
        +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>X5jgujn                              K                   ;
                 +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn                        K                   ;
     +N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:%>X5j%-                                ENDLEX              ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
              +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj%-                          ENDLEX              ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
        +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>X5jd%>                               NPxPlComC           ;
                 +N+Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%>                         NPxPlComC           ;
        +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjn%>                         NPxPlComC           ;
                        +N:%>X6                                   GOADA-              ; ! AG Px
!                       +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!                       +N:                                       DenominalAdjsV2     ;
