src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
KPL-miellahttuvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/First:KPL-miel#lahttuvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
a-miellahttuvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/First:a-miel#lahttuvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
LEXICON Eahpe_Noun
eahpedárkilvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/First:eahpe#dárkilvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
eahperievttalašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/First:eahpe#rievttalašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
eahpečielggasvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/First:eahpe#čielggasvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
LEXICON Noun
aktiivvalašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:aktiivvalašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
allavuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:allavuoh'ta LUONDU ;
almmustahttinvejolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:almmustahttin#vejolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
atnuvuoigatvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:atnu#vuoigatvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
barggahanváttisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:barggahan#váttisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
bassivuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:bassivuoh'ta LUONDU ;
berosgeahtesvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:berosgeahtesvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
birasollesvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:biras#ollesvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
bivdováttisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:bivdo#váttisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
borakeahttávuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:borakeahttávuoh'ta LUONDU ;
hárjehallanvejolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:hárjehallan#vejolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
báhppavuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:báhppavuoh'ta LUONDU ;
bávkalanlihkuhisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:bávkalan#lihkuhisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
dearpannanusvuohta:dearpan#nanusvuoh'ta LUONDU ; 
diehtomielalašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:diehto#mielalašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
divvunvejolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:divvun#vejolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
doapparbáikeváttisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:doappar#báike#váttisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
duodjegelbbolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:duodje#gelbbolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
dynámalašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:dynámalašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
raporterengeatnegasvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:raporteren#geatnegasvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
eahkesmállásiidoktavuohta:eahkes#mállásiid9#oktavuoh'ta LUONDU ;
ealáhusoktavuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ealáhus#oktavuoh'ta LUONDU ;
eanaoamastanvuoigatvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:eana#oamastan#vuoigatvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
eaŋkalvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:eaŋkalvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
esttelašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:esttelašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
olmmošvuođavuoigatvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:olmmošvuođa#vuoigatvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
fágaidgaskasašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:fágaid9#gaskasašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
geahnohisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:geahnohisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
gergesvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:gergesvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
gierdilvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:gierdilvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
girjevátnivuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:girje#vátnivuoh'ta LUONDU ;
gomuvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:gomuvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
gulahallangelbbolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:gulahallan#gelbbolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
guolástansearvevuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:guolástan#searvevuoh'ta LUONDU ;
gussolasvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:gussolasvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
gárvvisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:gárvvisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
heittohisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:heittohisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
háhttaváttisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:háhtta#váttisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
identtalašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:identtalašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
ildigallevuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ildi#gallevuoh'ta LUONDU ;
jeavddalašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:jeavddalašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
johtolatsihkarvuohta+v1+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:johtolat#sihkarvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
jálosvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:jálosvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
kritihkalašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:kritihkalašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
lahttuvuohta+Use/Sub+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:lahttovuoh'ta LUONDU ;
lihkohisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:lihko7hisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
lonohallangaskavuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:lonohallan#gaskavuoh'ta LUONDU ;
luovosbeanaváttisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:luovos#beana#váttisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
háleštallandilálašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:háleštallan#dilálašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
meašttirvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:meašttirvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
miidnalihkuhisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:miidna#lihkuhisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
muhtorsihkkellihkuhisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:muhtor#sihkkel#lihkuhisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
mánnávuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:mánnávuoh'ta LUONDU ;
máŋggahápmásašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:máŋgga#hápmásašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
nationáladearvvasvuohta+v2+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:nationála#dearvvašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
oaggunvejolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:oaggun#vejolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
oahpaheaiváilivuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:oahpaheai#váilivuoh'ta LUONDU ;
oamastanvuoigatvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:oamastan#vuoigatvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
oktavuođavejolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:oktavuođa#vejolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
olmmošsihkarvuohta+v2+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:olmmoš#sihkkarvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
ovddidanvuoigatvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ovddidan#vuoigatvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
ovttaveardásašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ovtta#veardásašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
prentenfriddjavuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:prenten#friddjavuoh'ta LUONDU ;
stráŋgavalljivuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:stráŋga#valljivuoh'ta LUONDU ;
riektesihkarvuohta+v2+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:riekte#sihkkarvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
roahkkadisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:roahkkadisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
ruovttubáikkivuoigatvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ruovttu#báikki#vuoigatvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
ráđálašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ráđálašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
seavdnjatvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:seavdnjatvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
siidaguoibmevuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:siida#guoibmevuoh'ta LUONDU ;
skuvladearvvašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:skuvla#dearvvašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
sohkavuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:sohkavuoh'ta LUONDU ;
studerengelbbolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:studeren#gelbbolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
stáhtagullevašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:stáhta#gullevašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
johtalusdorvvolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:johtalus#dorvvolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
sámegielmáhtolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:sáme#giel#máhtolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
sávrivuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:sávrivuoh'ta LUONDU ;
ulbmillašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ulbmillašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
veahkaválddálašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:veahka#válddálašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
vildavuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:vildavuoh'ta LUONDU ;
vuodjingeatnegasvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:vuodjin#geatnegasvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
vuosttašvuoigatvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:vuosttaš#vuoigatvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
vuođđováttisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:vuođđo#váttisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
válddálašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:válddálašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
váttisvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:váttisvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
áigodatsirddolašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:áigodat#sirddolašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
ámmátlašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ámmátlašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
ávkkástallanvuoigatvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:ávkkástallan#vuoigatvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
čearddalašvuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:čearddalašvuoh'ta LUONDU ;
šlieddavuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:šlieddavuoh'ta LUONDU ;
čáhcebuorrevuohta+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen:čáhce#buorrevuoh'ta LUONDU ;
